Arkansas, session 2025, HB1935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2703(29)(C), concerning the definition
of "project costs" under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended
to read as follows:
(C) Eligible project costs must be incurred within:
(i) Four (4) years from the date a financial
incentive agreement was approved by the commission; or
(ii) Six (6) years from the date a financial
incentive agreement was approved by the commission in connection with a
project qualifying for retention tax credits under § 15-4-2706(c)(1)(A) and
approved on or after June 22, 2017 a modernization and automation tax credit
under § 15-4-2706(c);

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706(c), concerning investment tax
incentives under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to read
as follows:
*JLL164*
04-08-2025 09:40:08 JLL164

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1935
(c)(1)(A) An application for a retention modernization and automation
tax credit under this subsection shall be submitted to the commission.
(B)(i) The application shall be submitted to the
commission before incurring any project costs are incurred.
(ii) With the exception of preconstruction costs,
only those project costs incurred after the commission's approval of the
application are eligible for the modernization and automation tax credit.
(C) Upon the approval of the application, the commission
shall execute a financial incentive agreement with the applicant that shall:
(i) Require that the project forming the basis of
the application be completed within six (6) years from the date of the
execution of the financial incentive agreement;
(ii) Require that the applicant maintain within the
state the current yearly average level of payroll and employment during the
course of the project and for twenty-four (24) months after the termination
of the project; and
(iii) Contain a forfeiture provision that requires
an applicant to return any modernization and automation tax credits claimed
for the project if the applicant is found to have breached the financial
incentive agreement.
(2) The modernization and automation tax credit against the
qualified business's sales and use tax liability under this subsection is
available only to Arkansas businesses that:
(A) Have been in continuous operation in the state for at
least two (2) years;
(B) Invest Incur a minimum of five twenty-five million
dollars ($5,000,000) ($25,000,000) in a project costs, including land,
buildings, and equipment used in the construction, expansion, or
modernization; and
(C) Hold a direct-pay sales and use tax permit from the
department before submitting an application for incentives; and
(D) Have received a positive cost-benefit analysis from
the commission for the project that forms the basis of the businesses'
financial incentive agreement.
(3)(A) If allowed, the modernization and automation tax credit
shall be a percentage up to five percent (5%) of the eligible project costs.
04-08-2025 09:40:08 JLL164

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1935
(B) The amount of the credit shall be five-tenths percent
(0.5%) above the state sales and use tax rate in effect at the time a
financial incentive agreement is signed with the commission The maximum
modernization and automation tax credit that may be used in a fiscal year by
an applicant is two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(C) In any one (1) year following the year of the
expenditures, credits taken cannot exceed fifty percent (50%) of the direct
pay sales and use tax liability of the qualified business for taxable
purchases.
(D) Unused modernization and automation tax credits may be
carried forward for a period of up to five (5) years beyond the year in which
the modernization and automation tax credit was first earned.
(E) Retention tax credits earned between forty-nine (49)
and seventy-two (72) months after the commission approved the financial
incentive agreement may be taken only:
(i) On and after July 1, 2023;
(ii) After the director has determined, based on
evidence provided by the applicant, that the applicant's investment in the
part of the qualified project to be completed between forty-nine (49) and
seventy-two (72) months after the commission approved the financial incentive
agreement will generate a return that will likely be equal to or greater than
the amount of retention tax credits under this subdivision (c)(3)(E); and
(iii) For an application filed with the commission
between June 22, 2017, and June 28, 2017.
(F) The maximum amount of retention tax credits under
subdivision (c)(3)(E) of this section that may be used in any fiscal year by
a qualified applicant is seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).
(4)(A) Upon determination by the director determining that the a
project qualifies is eligible for a modernization and automation tax credit
under this subsection, the director shall certify to the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration that the project qualifies and shall
transmit with his or her certification the documents or copies of the
documents upon which the certification was based.
(B) The secretary department shall provide forms to the
qualified business on which to claim the modernization and automation tax
credit.
04-08-2025 09:40:08 JLL164

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1935
(C) At the end of the calendar year in which the
application is made and at the end of each calendar year thereafter until the
project is completed, the qualified business shall certify on the form forms
provided by the secretary department the amount of expenditures on the
project costs incurred during the preceding calendar year.
(D) Upon receipt of the form certifying expenditures the
project costs, the secretary department shall determine the amount due as a
credit for the preceding calendar year and issue a memorandum of credit to
the qualified business.
(E) The credit against the qualified business's sales and
use tax liability shall be a percentage of the eligible project costs equal
to five-tenths percent (0.5%) above the state sales and use tax rate in
effect at the time the financial incentive agreement was approved by the
commission.
(5) If a business plans to apply for incentives applies for a
modernization and automation tax credit under this subsection and also plans
to apply for incentives a job-creation tax credit under § 15-4-2705, the
financial incentive agreement under § 15-4-2705 agreements for the incentives
shall be approved within two (2) years after signing the financial incentive
agreement under this subsection one (1) year of each other.
(6) A qualified business that enters into a lease for leases a
building or equipment for a period of at least five (5) years may count the
lease payments for the first five (5) years as a qualifying expenditure for
the investment threshold required for this investment incentive.
(7)(A) A business may apply for the retention tax credit under
this subsection through June 30, 2017.
(B)(i) An application for the retention tax credit under
this subsection shall not be accepted on or after July 1, 2017.
(ii) However, projects that qualify for a retention
tax credit based on an application filed through June 30, 2017, shall
continue to earn credits as provided in this section.
(iii) Retention tax credits issued on a project that
qualifies for retention tax credits based on an application filed through
June 30, 2017, shall remain in effect and shall be taken and carried forward
as otherwise provided in this section.

04-08-2025 09:40:08 JLL164

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1935
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2712(b)(6), concerning restrictions on
the use of incentives under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(6) The investment tax credit authorized under § 15-4-2706(b)
shall not be combined with the sales and use tax credit modernization and
automation tax credit authorized under § 15-4-2706(c) for the same project.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3501(g), concerning the increased tax
refund for major maintenance and improvement projects, is amended to read as
follows:
(g) An expenditure shall not qualify for both the increased refund for
major maintenance and improvement projects under this section and the
retention modernization and automation tax credit provided for in § 15-4-
2706(c).

SECTION 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-4 of this act are effective on
and after October 1, 2025.

/s/Eaves

















04-08-2025 09:40:08 JLL164